Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2068
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Voting agreements.

(1) Two or more shareholders may provide for the manner in which they will vote their shares by signing an agreement for that purpose. A voting agreement created under this section shall not be subject to the provisions of section 21-2067.

(2) A voting agreement created under this section shall be specifically enforceable.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 68.